District of Columbia statutes.
22-4232

Establishment of the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.

There is established as an independent agency within the District of Columbia government the Criminal Justice Coordinating Council.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 1503, 48 DCR 6981
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 1403 of Fiscal Year 2002 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-124, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7861).